Vermont statutes. Title 13 Crimes and Criminal Procedure
Subchapter 2. Resource Guide Posting; Private Cause of Action for Victims; Victim Protection

§ 2661.
Resource guide posting.

A notice offering help to victims of human trafficking shall be accessible on the official website of the Vermont Department of Labor and may be posted in a prominent and accessible location in workplaces.

The notice should provide contact information for at least one local law enforcement agency and provide information regarding the National Human Trafficking Resource Center (NHTRC) hotline as follows:

“If you or someone you know is being forced to engage in any activity and cannot leave — whether it is commercial sex, housework, farm work, or any other activity — call the toll-free National Human Trafficking Resource Center Hotline at 1-888-373-7888 to access help and services. The toll-free hotline is:

• Available 24 hours a day, 7 days a week

• Operated by a nonprofit, nongovernmental organization

• Anonymous and confidential

• Accessible in 170 languages

• Able to provide help, referral to services, training, and general information.”

The notice described in this section should be made available in English, Spanish, and, if requested by an employer, another language.

The Vermont Department of Labor shall develop and implement an education plan to raise awareness among Vermont employers about the problem of human trafficking, about the hotline described in this section, and about other resources that may be available to employers, employees, and potential victims of human trafficking. On or before January 15, 2013, the Department shall report to the House and Senate Committees on Judiciary, the House Committee on Human Services, and the Senate Committee on Health and Welfare on the progress achieved in developing and implementing the notice requirement and education plan required by this section.

HISTORY:

Added 2011, No. 55, § 2.

§ 2662.
Private cause of action.

A victim of human trafficking may bring an action against the offender in the Civil Division of the Superior Court for damages, injunctive relief, punitive damages in the case of a willful violation, and reasonable costs and attorney’s fees. Actual damages may include any loss for which restitution is available under section 2657 of this chapter.

If the victim is deceased or otherwise unable to represent himself or herself, the victim may be represented by a legal guardian, family member, or other representative appointed by the court, provided that the legal guardian, family member, or other representative appointed by the court has not benefited in any way from the trafficking.

In a civil action brought under this section, the victim’s alleged consent to the human trafficking is immaterial and shall not be admitted.

HISTORY:

Added 2011, No. 55, § 2.

§ 2663.
Classification of victims; immigration assistance.

Classification of victims of human trafficking. As soon as practicable after the initial encounter with a person who reasonably appears to a law enforcement agency, a State’s Attorneys’ office, or the Office of the Attorney General to be a victim of human trafficking, such agency or office shall:

Notify the Victim’s Compensation Program at the Center for Crime Victim Services that such person may be eligible for services under this chapter.

Make a preliminary assessment of whether such victim or possible victim of human trafficking appears to meet the criteria for certification as a victim of a severe form of trafficking in persons as defined in 22 U.S.C. § 7105 (Trafficking Victims Protection Act) or appears to be otherwise eligible for any federal, state, or local benefits and services. If it is determined that the victim appears to meet such criteria, the agency or office shall report the finding to the victim and shall refer the victim to services available, including legal service providers. If the possible victim is under the age of 18 or is a vulnerable adult, the agency or office shall also notify the Family Services Division of the Department for Children and Families or the Office of Adult Protective Services in the Department of Disabilities, Aging, and Independent Living.

Law enforcement assistance with respect to immigration. After the agency or office makes a preliminary assessment pursuant to subdivision (a)(2) of this section that a victim of human trafficking or a possible victim of human trafficking appears to meet the criteria for certification as a victim of a severe form of trafficking in persons, as defined in 22 U.S.C. § 7105 and upon the request of such victim, the agency or office shall provide the victim of human trafficking with a completed and executed U.S. citizenship and immigration service (USCIS) form I-914 supplement B declaration of law enforcement officer for victim of human trafficking in persons or a USCIS form I-918, supplement B, U nonimmigrant status certification, or both. These endorsements shall be completed by the certifying officer in accordance with the forms’ instructions and applicable rules and regulations. The victim of human trafficking may choose which form to have the certifying officer complete.

HISTORY:

Added 2011, No. 55, § 2.